Wisconsin, session 2025, SB591.
do enact as follows:SB591,11Section 1. 15.227 (16) of the statutes is created to read:SB591,2,4215.227 (16) Council on dual enrollment. There is created in the 3department of workforce development a council on dual enrollment consisting of all 4of the following members, appointed for 3-year terms:SB591,2,65(a) Two members appointed by the president of the University of Wisconsin 6System.SB591,2,77(b) Two members appointed by the director of the technical college system.SB591,2,88(c) Two members appointed by the state superintendent of public instruction.SB591,2,109(d) Two members appointed by the president of the Wisconsin Association of 10Independent Colleges and Universities.SB591,2,1111(e) One member appointed by the speaker of the assembly.SB591,2,1212(f) One member appointed by the senate majority leader.SB591,2,1413(g) One member who is a school district administrator appointed by the joint 14committee on legislative organization.SB591,3,11(h) One member who represents tribal colleges in this state.SB591,3,32(i) One member who is a school board member appointed by the executive 3director of the Wisconsin Association of School BoardsSB591,3,54(j) One member appointed by the board of directors of the Wisconsin Council 5of Religious and Independent Schools.SB591,26Section 2. 36.11 (3) (b) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 7is amended to read:SB591,3,24836.11 (3) (b) Subject to s. 36.31 (2m), the board shall establish policies for the 9appropriate transfer of credits between institutions within the system, including 10postsecondary credits earned by a high school pupil enrolled in a course at an 11institution within the system under the program under s. 118.55. If the board 12determines that postsecondary credits earned by a high school pupil under the 13program under s. 118.55 are not transferable under this paragraph, the board shall 14permit the individual to take an examination to determine the individual’s 15competency in the subject area of the course and, if the individual receives a passing 16score on the examination, shall award equivalent credits to the individual. The 17board’s policies under this paragraph shall provide that, no later than September 1, 182026, all credits for core general education courses, as defined in s. 36.31 (2m) (a) 2., 19including postsecondary credits earned by a high school pupil through the program 20under s. 118.55 for completion of a core general education course, are transferable 21between institutions within the system and satisfy general education requirements 22at the receiving institution. No later than December 31, 2025, the board shall 23submit a proposal to the joint committee on employment relations related to the 24transfer policies.SB591,31Section 3. 36.11 (3) (cm) 5. of the statutes is amended to read:SB591,4,3236.11 (3) (cm) 5. Core general education courses that are subject to the 3agreement agreements required under s. 36.31 (2m) (b) and (bm).SB591,44Section 4. 36.31 (2m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB591,4,19536.31 (2m) (b) Notwithstanding s. 36.09 (3) (a), the Board of Regents and the 6technical college system board shall, and the governing boards of tribally controlled 7colleges in this state and the association, on behalf of private colleges, may, enter 8into and implement an agreement that identifies an array of not less than 72 9credits of core general education courses and establishes policies for ensuring that, 10beginning in the 2022-23 academic year, credits for completing the courses are 11transferable and would satisfy general education requirements at the receiving 12institution or college, between and within each institution and technical college, 13and each tribally controlled college and private college that elects to participate in 14the agreement. Beginning in the 2027-28 academic year, the agreement shall 15ensure that postsecondary credits earned by a high school pupil through the 16program under s. 38.12 (14) for completion of a core general education course 17included in the agreement are transferable and satisfy general education 18requirements at the receiving institution, technical college, or participating tribal 19college.SB591,520Section 5. 36.31 (2m) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB591,5,102136.31 (2m) (bm) Notwithstanding s. 36.09 (3) (a), the Board of Regents and 22the association, on behalf of private colleges, shall enter into and implement an 23agreement that identifies an array of not less than 36 credits of core general 24education courses and establishes policies for ensuring that, beginning in the 2027-128 academic year, credits for completing the courses are transferable and would 2satisfy general education requirements at the receiving institution or at the 3receiving private college that chooses to participate in the agreement. 4Notwithstanding s. 36.11 (3) (c), the agreement shall ensure that postsecondary 5credits earned by a high school pupil through the program under s. 118.55 for 6completion of a core general education course included in the agreement are 7transferable and satisfy general education requirements at the receiving institution 8or at the receiving private college that chooses to participate in the agreement. A 9private college may exclude from application of the agreement any course that does 10not align with an institutional religious or professional pathway requirement.SB591,611Section 6. 36.31 (2m) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB591,5,181236.31 (2m) (c) The Board of Regents and the technical college system board 13shall ensure that the governing bodies of tribally controlled colleges and the 14association, on behalf of private colleges, have an opportunity to elect to participate 15in the agreements specified in pars. par. (am) and (b). The Board of Regents and 16the technical college system board shall ensure that the governing bodies of tribally 17controlled colleges have an opportunity to elect to participate in the agreement 18specified in par. (b). SB591,719Section 7. 36.31 (2m) (d) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2015, is amended to read:SB591,5,232136.31 (2m) (d) Notwithstanding pars. (am) 1. and, (b), and (bm), no 22agreement under this subsection may limit the transfer of credits for core general 23education courses between institutions within the system.SB591,824Section 8. 36.65 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB591,6,6136.65 (3) Core general education credit transfers. The board shall 2include in the report required under sub. (2) a description of the agreement 3agreements entered into under s. 36.31 (2m) (b) and (bm) and a summary of the 4board’s implementation of the agreement. This agreements. With respect to the 5agreement entered into under s. 36.31 (2m) (bm), this subsection first applies to the 6report required under sub. (2) that applies to the 2014-15 2027-28 academic year.SB591,97Section 9. 38.12 (14) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB591,6,8838.12 (14) (a) 1. The pupil has completed the 10th 8th grade.SB591,109Section 10. 38.12 (14) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB591,6,141038.12 (14) (a) 3. The pupil notifies the school board of the school district in 11which the pupil resides of his or her intent to attend a technical college under this 12subsection by March May 1 if the pupil intends to enroll in the fall semester and, by 13October November 1 if the pupil intends to enroll in the spring semester, and by 14April 1 if the pupil intends to enroll in the summer semester or session.SB591,1115Section 11. 38.12 (14) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB591,7,51638.12 (14) (c) If a child attends a technical college under this subsection, the 17technical college shall ensure that the child’s educational program meets the high 18school graduation requirements under s. 118.33. At least 30 days before the 19beginning of the technical college semester or session in which the pupil will be 20enrolled, the school board of the school district in which the pupil resides shall 21notify the pupil, in writing, if a course in which the pupil will be enrolled does not 22meet the high school graduation requirements and whether the course is 23comparable to a course offered in the school district. If the pupil disagrees with the 24school board’s decision regarding comparability of courses or satisfaction of high 1school graduation requirements, the pupil may appeal the school board’s decision to 2the state superintendent within 30 days after the decision. The state 3superintendent’s decision is final and is not subject to review under subch. III of ch. 4227. The pupil is eligible to receive both high school and technical college credit for 5courses successfully completed at the technical college.SB591,126Section 12. 38.12 (14) (d) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb591 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb591 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB591 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB591 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB591: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting